Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4030
Commodities and options.

Unless the power of attorney
otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to commodities and options authorizes the agent to:

(1) Buy, sell, exchange,
assign, settle, and exercise commodity futures contracts and call or put options
on stocks or stock indexes traded on a regulated option exchange; and

(2) Establish, continue,
modify, and terminate option accounts.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 30.